Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.280

Lien for labor, material, equipment used in controlling noxious weeds.

Every activated county noxious weed control board performing labor, furnishing material, or renting, leasing, or otherwise supplying equipment, to be used in the control of noxious weeds, or in causing control of noxious weeds, upon any property pursuant to the provisions of chapter 17.10 RCW has a lien upon such property for the labor performed, material furnished, or equipment supplied whether performed, furnished, or supplied with the consent of the owner, or his or her agent, of such property, or without the consent of said owner or agent.

[ 2011 c 336 s 456; 1987 c 438 s 35; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 13.]